Indiana, session 2026, HB1422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-13-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 21. Employment Practices of State Agencies and
Reporting
Sec. 1. Except as provided in section 2 of this chapter, the
definitions in 8 U.S.C. 1101 apply throughout this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "attorney general" means the
office of the attorney general created by IC 4-6-1-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "state agency" means:
(1) an authority, a board, a branch, a commission, a
committee, a department, a division, or another
instrumentality of the executive, including the administrative,
department of state government; or
(2) a state educational institution (as defined in
IC 21-7-13-32).
Sec. 4. A state agency shall give hiring preference to an
2026 IN 1422—LS 7033/DI 149


individual who is a citizen or national of the United States over
another individual who is an alien if the two (2) individuals are
equally qualified.
Sec. 5. A state agency may not sponsor an individual for a new
H-1B visa after July 1, 2026, unless the following conditions are
met:
(1) The state agency submits information to the attorney
general, in a manner and form determined by the attorney
general, that demonstrates the following:
(A) The state agency will not pay the potential H-1B visa
employee less than the required wage rate under 20 CFR
655.731.
(B) The working conditions of the potential H-1B visa
employee will not adversely affect the working conditions
of employees similarly employed in the area of intended
employment, as required under 20 CFR 655.732.
(2) The attorney general approves the state agency sponsoring
the individual for a new H-1B visa based on the information
provided under subdivision (1).
Sec. 6. Not later than July 1, 2027, and not later than July 1 of
each year thereafter, each state agency shall do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes the following information
regarding each employee the state agency sponsored for a new
H-1B visa during the immediately preceding state fiscal year:
(A) The employee's employment title and salary.
(B) A description of the employee's employment position,
including the qualifications required for the employment
position.
(C) The total number of citizens and nationals of the
United States who applied for the employment position
described in clause (B).
(2) Submit the report prepared under subdivision (1) to the
attorney general.
Sec. 7. The attorney general shall post reports received under
section 6 of this chapter on the attorney general's website.
SECTION 2. IC 5-35.7-1-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. As used in this article,
"individual with unlawful status" means an individual who is not
a:
(1) citizen or national of the United States; or
(2) qualified alien (as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1641).
2026 IN 1422—LS 7033/DI 149


SECTION 3. IC 5-35.7-4-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), neither the
state nor a political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) may
directly fund services or provide a grant or other funding to an
entity that:
(1) provides services to or on behalf of an individual with
unlawful status in connection with an immigration
proceeding; or
(2) is a party to a civil action, administrative proceeding, or
other legal process for the purpose of challenging,
obstructing, or delaying the enforcement of federal
immigration laws with respect to an individual with unlawful
status.
(b) The following may bring an action for injunctive relief based
on a violation of subsection (a):
(1) The attorney general.
(2) An individual.
An individual who prevails in an action under this subsection is
entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(c) This section does not apply to expenses incurred in
connection with a criminal or juvenile delinquency proceeding,
including public defender services.
2026 IN 1422—LS 7033/DI 149